California, session 20252026, AB2460.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) Pupil mental health needs are widespread and urgent. The State Department of Education has reported that one in five schoolaged youth experiences mental health issues that interfere with learning and that more than half of young people with mental health needs remain untreated or undertreated.(2) Pupils from immigrant families face heightened and distinct harms during periods of increased immigration enforcement. The State Department of Education has stated that it is providing resources to preserve access to education for pupils from immigrant families during times of “increased fear of immigration enforcement” and has recognized that the threat of immigration enforcement can impair the ability of many pupils, including both pupils who are undocumented and pupils who are United States citizens, to thrive in school. The State Department of Education also reports that approximately half of California’s pupils are members of immigrant families and that one in five children in California are members of mixed-status families, the vast majority of whom are United States citizens.(3) Immigration raids and enforcement activity can directly disrupt school attendance and opportunities to learn. A 2025 Stanford study found that pupil absences increased by 22 percent in Central Valley school districts affected by immigration raids, with especially pronounced effects among younger pupils.(4) The impact of immigration enforcement is not limited to attendance. Reporting from CalMatters in 2025 documented that immigration raids were straining the mental health of children and school communities across California, that children need routine to thrive academically and emotionally, and that sudden increases in immigration-related fear can make it harder for schools to detect behavior changes and mental health symptoms and to respond effectively.(5) California has long recognized the right of all children to access public education regardless of immigration status. The United States Supreme Court held in Plyler v. Doe (457 U.S. 202) that all children have a right to a free public education regardless of immigration status and the State Department of Education continues to reaffirm that right.(6) California law already limits schoolsite cooperation with immigration enforcement to protect access to education. Existing state law prohibits school officials and employees of a local educational agency from allowing an officer or employee of an agency conducting immigration enforcement to enter a nonpublic area of a schoolsite for any purpose without a valid judicial warrant, judicial subpoena, or court order. Local school guidance has accordingly emphasized safe-haven policies, legal review of warrants, and procedures for protecting pupil rights on campus.(7) Local educational agencies are increasingly being encouraged to develop ad hoc emergency response systems to address immigration-enforcement activity affecting students and families. The Los Angeles County Office of Education’s Supporting Immigrant Students and Families Toolkit recommends safe-haven policies, schoolsite protocols for responding to immigration officials, staff training on the impact of deportation on pupils and families, emergency response planning, counseling for pupils whose family members have been detained, and referral pathways to mental health professionals and community-based organizations. These local efforts demonstrate both the seriousness of the harm and the need for broader statewide guidance so schools are not left to respond inconsistently to pupil trauma and family crisis.(8) California has taken important steps to address pupil behavioral health through model referral protocols and local referral policies, including a multitiered system of supports approach, but those measures do not by themselves provide broader guidance to help schools respond consistently when communitywide trauma, fear of family separation, and local emergencies destabilize pupils and families. Local guidance now calls not only for referrals, but also for emergency communication plans, trauma-informed staff training, counseling for pupils affected by detention, family crisis planning, and partnerships with legal aid and mental health providers, underscoring the need for a more comprehensive statewide guidance.(b) Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that schools are better prepared to respond when pupils are affected by trauma, fear, and instability by requiring the update of the model referral protocols to include guidance for pupils impacted by immigration enforcement that strengthens early identification, culturally responsive and multilingual support, family and community partnerships, and continuity of care.SEC. 2. Section 49428.12 is added to the Education Code, to read:49428.12. (a) The department, in consultation with appropriate stakeholders, shall update the model referral protocols for addressing pupil behavioral health concerns developed pursuant to Section 49428.1 to include guidance on providing equity-centered mental health supports in case of a local emergency related to immigration enforcement activities or deportations of pupils or their family members.(b) The department shall post the updated model referral protocols on its internet website on or before July 1, 2027.SEC. 3. Section 49428.3 is added to the Education Code, to read:49428.3. (a) On or before July 1, 2028, the governing board or body of a local educational agency shall adopt, at a regularly scheduled public meeting, an update to the policy on referral protocols for addressing behavioral health concerns adopted pursuant to Section 49428.2, to include guidance on providing equity-centered mental health supports in case of a local emergency related to immigration enforcement activities or deportations of pupils or their family members.(b) The updated policy adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be either based on the updated model referral protocols developed by the department pursuant to Section 49428.12 or developed in consultation with school and community stakeholders and school-linked behavioral health professionals, and shall, at a minimum, address procedures relating to referrals to behavioral health professionals and support services.(c) Policies adopted before January 1, 2027, may be considered to meet the requirements of this section, if they fulfill the requirements of this section.SEC. 4. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SECTION 1.Article 1.3 (commencing with Section 49417.5) is added to Chapter 9 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code, to read:1.3.Mental Health Framework49417.5.(a)The department, in consultation with the State Department of Health Care Services and appropriate stakeholders, including stakeholders with experience in addressing locally declared emergencies, shall develop a framework to ensure (1) that pupils have access to comprehensive mental health support within their education environment that is adaptable to local emergencies and (2) that local educational agencies strive to promote a safe, supportive educational environment that includes an equity-centered mental health framework adaptable to locally declared emergencies in which community mental health resources, networks, and other resources are provided to pupils.(b)The mental health framework described in subdivision (a) shall strive to include, but not be limited to, processes that support all of the following:(1)Promoting screening and early identification by developing and implementing a plan to provide staff with guidance to identify early signs of mental health vulnerabilities.(2)Leveraging family and community partnerships by providing resources to parents and partnering with community-based organizations.(3)Providing culturally responsive care to reduce disparities, including, but not limited to, multilingual resources.(4)Leveraging partnerships to increase access to digital and telehealth services to increase reach.(5)Identifying early partnerships that can be created and sustained to address the needs following a locally declared emergency.